Washington statutes.
RCW 41.22.020

Washington state patrol and the department of fish and wildlife—Volunteer chaplain authorized.

The Washington state patrol and the department of fish and wildlife may utilize the services of a volunteer chaplain.

[ 2009 c 204 s 2; 1985 c 223 s 2.]